Mississippi, session 2026, SB2146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to Sharkey County for the purpose of defraying the costs of certain infrastructure projects and initiatives for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027............................. $ 3,000,000.00. SECTION 2.  The funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1 of this act are authorized for the following purposes: (a)  To defray costs of improvements to the Emergency Management services; (b)  To defray costs of renovation, restoration or replacement of infrastructure related to housing, health services, transportation improvements, and business and industry initiatives; (c)  To defray costs of developing the Sharkey County Industrial Park; and (d)  To defray costs of workforce development initiatives. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.